Florida, session 2026, HB773.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb773-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 773 2026
Section 1. Section 366.16, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
366.16 Public utility earnings transfers by a
municipality; percentage of transfers; prohibition; disclosure
requirement.-
(1) A municipality or an agency thereof that is regulated
by this chapter pursuant to s. 366.04 may transfer a portion of
its public utility earnings to the general fund of the
municipality for public utility purposes.
(2) If the public utilities are supplied to customers
located within the municipality, the percentage of transfers
authorized by subsection (1) shall be in a fixed amount not to
exceed 10 percent of the municipality's or agency's general
fund. The amount shall be stated as a percentage of the
municipality's or agency's general fund that may be supported by
transfers.
(3) If the public utilities are supplied to customers
located outside the municipality, the percentage of transfers
authorized by subsection (1) shall be in a variable amount not
to exceed 10 percent of the municipality's or agency's general
fund. The amount shall be based on the percentage of customers
located outside the municipal boundaries and shall decrease as
the percentage of customers located outside the municipal
boundaries increases.
(4) The amount of percentage of transfers authorized by
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb773-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 773 2026
subsection (1) shall be established or reestablished by local
referendum, subject to a majority vote of customers located
within and outside a municipality voting in the referendum.
(5) The restriction of 10 percent in subsection (2) and
subsection (3) does not apply in the event of a disaster or
emergency such that a state of emergency is declared by the
Governor pursuant to chapter 252. In such instances, the
governing body of a municipality may, by passage of a resolution
by four-fifths vote, adopt the amount of percentage of
transfers. Any such amount of percentage of transfers adopted
that exceeds the restriction of 10 percent in subsection (2) and
subsection (3) shall be repaid to the general fund within 3
fiscal years.
(6) A municipality or an agency thereof that is regulated
by this chapter pursuant to s. 366.04 may not transfer a portion
of its public utility earnings to the general fund of the
municipality or agency thereof for nonpublic utility purposes,
including, but not limited to:
(a) Any restricted revenues.
(b) Grant funds designated for specific capital or
operational purposes.
(c) Any revenues from impact fees.
(d) Any proceeds from debt, including bonds, notes, or
loans.

Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb773-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 773 2026
A municipality that transfers a portion of its public utility
earnings to the general fund of the municipality for nonpublic
utility purposes may not receive state funds for infrastructure
projects under chapter 216.
(7) A municipality, or an agency thereof, that transfers a
portion of its public utility earnings to the general fund of
the municipality pursuant to this section shall disclose in its
annual budget and financial report:
(a) The amount of percentage of transfers.
(b) The percentage such amount represents of public
utility earnings.
(c) The purpose of and reason for the transfer.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb773-00